Nevada, session 83, SB444.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 392.4637 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
392.4637 1. The board of trustees of each school district shall
adopt a policy concerning the use and possession by pupils of [a
pager, cellular telephone or any other similar] an electronic
communication device [used for communication] while on the
premises of a public school or while at an activity sponsored by a
public school.
2. The policy adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Prescribe appropriate measures for disciplining a pupil who
violates the policy [.] that include, without limitation, a system to
rate violations of a policy adopted pursuant to subsection 1 on a
progressive scale based on the number and seriousness of the
violations.
(b) Prescribe limitations on the use of an electronic
communication device during instruction.
(c) Include exceptions to any limitations on the use of an
electronic communication device prescribed as part of a policy
adopted pursuant to subsection 1, including, without limitation,
exceptions:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(1) On the use of an electronic communication device
during an emergency or crisis or to manage the health of a pupil;
(2) If a teacher allows for the use of an electronic
communication device for instructional purposes; and
(3) If the use of an electronic communication device is
included as part of an individualized education program or a plan
developed in accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act
of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794.
(d) Be included within each copy of the rules of behavior
for pupils that the school district provides to pupils pursuant to
NRS 392.463.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Electronic communication device” means any electronic
device that is capable of transmitting any audio, written or
pictorial information or messages to another electronic device.
The term does not include an electronic device issued to a pupil by
the school district or the school in which the pupil is enrolled.
(b) “Individualized education program” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(1)(A).
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective:
1. Upon passage and approval for the purpose of performing
any administrative tasks necessary to adopt the policy required by
NRS 392.4637, as amended by section 1 of this act, not later than
June 30, 2026; and
2. On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)